Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 35 Military Justice

35.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“State” means one (1) of the several states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, and the United States Virgin Islands;

“Cadet,” “candidate,” or “midshipman” means a person who is enrolled in or attending a state military academy, a regional training institute, or any other formal education program for the purpose of becoming a commissioned officer in the state military forces;

“Officer” means a commissioned or warrant officer;

“Superior commissioned officer” means a commissioned officer superior in rank or command;

“Enlisted member” means a person in an enlisted grade;

“State active duty” means full-time military duty in the state military forces under an order of the Governor or otherwise issued by authority of law, and paid by state funds, and includes travel to and from the duty;

“Military court” means a court-martial or a court of inquiry;

“Military judge” means an official of a general and special court-martial detailed in accordance with KRS

35.125

;

“Classified information” means:

Any information or material that has been determined by an official of the United States or any state pursuant to law, an executive order, or regulation to require protection against unauthorized disclosure for reasons of national or state security; and

Any restricted data, as defined in the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42

U.S.C. sec. 2014(y)

;

“Code” means this chapter;

“National security” means the national defense and foreign relations of the United States;

“Commanding officer” includes only commissioned officers of the state military forces and shall include officers in charge only when administering nonjudicial punishment under KRS

35.070

. The term “commander” has the same meaning unless the context otherwise requires;

“Day” means:

For the purpose of pay, one (1) day equals one (1) unit training assembly; and

For all other purposes, one (1) day equals one (1) calendar day;

“Record,” when used in connection with the proceedings of a court-martial, means:

An official written transcript, written summary, or other writing relating to the proceedings; or

An official audiotape, videotape, digital image or file, or similar material from which sound, or sound and visual images, depicting the proceedings may be reproduced;

“Duty status other than state active duty” means any other type of duty not in federal service and not full-time in the active service of the state, under an order issued by authority of law and includes travel to and from the duty;

“Judge advocate” means a commissioned officer of the organized state military forces who is a member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state, and is:

Certified or designated as a judge advocate in the Judge Advocate General’s Corps of the Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard, or a reserve component of one (1) of these; or

Certified as a non-federally recognized judge advocate, under regulations promulgated pursuant to this provision, by the senior judge advocate of the commander of the force in the state military forces of which the accused is a member, as competent to perform those military justice duties required by this code. If there is no judge advocate available, then the certification may be made by a senior judge advocate of the commander of another force in the state military forces, as the convening authority directs;

“Accuser” means a person who signs and swears to charges, any person who directs that charges nominally be signed and sworn to by another, and any other person who has an interest other than an official interest in the prosecution of the accused;

“Military” refers to any or all of the Armed Forces;

“Convening authority” includes, in addition to the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being or a successor in command to the convening authority;

“Officer in charge” means a member of the naval militia, the Navy, the Marine Corps, or the Coast Guard designated as such by appropriate authority;

“Senior force commander” means the commander of the same force of the state military forces as the accused;

“Senior force judge advocate” means the senior judge advocate of the commander of the same force of the state military forces as the accused and who is that commander’s chief legal advisor;

“State military forces” means the Kentucky National Guard as defined in Title 32 of the United States Code and as organized under the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The unorganized militia, state defense force, state national guard, home guard, or any other name of any state force that does not meet this definition shall not be part of the “state military forces” under this code; and

“Military offenses” means those offenses prescribed under KRS

35.440

,

35.442

,

35.450

,

35.451

,

35.470

,

35.471

,

35.472

,

35.473

,

35.474

,

35.4751

,

35.476

,

35.478

,

35.481

,

35.486

,

35.491

,

35.575

,

35.577

,

35.580

,

35.585

,

35.590

,

35.595

,

35.600

,

35.605

,

35.609

,

35.614

,

35.620

,

35.625

,

35.630

,

35.635

,

35.637

,

35.640

,

35.642

,

35.645

,

35.650

,

35.652

,

35.654

,

35.657

,

35.660

,

35.665

,

35.671

,

35.679

,

35.681

,

35.683

,

35.685

,

35.690

,

35.725

,

35.727

, and

35.730

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 1; 1970, ch. 56, § 1; 1986, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 307, § 1, effective April 9, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 118, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 32, § 6, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 75, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2013). In subsection (24) of this statute, the list of KRS sections has been corrected. During the 2013 Regular Session of the General Assembly, the amendments to the Model State Code of Military Justice appeared in House Bill 362 and House Bill 167. The section numbers in these bills changed several times when alternative versions of the bills were introduced, but some of the internal references in subsection (24) of this statute ( 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 32, sec. 6) were inadvertently not corrected to correspond to those changes. Under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has corrected those references to match the list that appears in Article 1(a)(14) of the Model State Code of Military Justice.

35.015.
Persons subject to this code — Jurisdiction.

This code applies to all members of the state military forces at all times and in all places.

Subject matter jurisdiction is established if a nexus exists between an offense, either military or non-military, and the state military force. Courts-martial have primary jurisdiction of military offenses of this code. A proper civilian court has primary jurisdiction of a non-military offense when an act or omission violates both this code and local criminal law, foreign or domestic. In such a case, a court-martial may be initiated only after the civilian authority has declined to prosecute or dismissed the charge, provided jeopardy has not attached. Jurisdiction over attempted crimes, conspiracy crimes, solicitation, and accessory crimes must be determined by the underlying offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 2; 1970, ch. 56, § 2; 2013, ch. 32, § 7, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Kentucky active militia, officers and enlisted men subject to code, KRS

37.265

.

35.020.
Jurisdiction to try certain personnel.

Each person discharged from the state military forces who is later charged with having fraudulently obtained a discharge is, subject to KRS

35.215

, subject to trial by court-martial on that charge and is, after apprehension, subject to this code while in custody under the direction of the state military forces for that trial. Upon conviction of that charge that person is subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this code committed prior to the fraudulent discharge.

No person who has deserted from the state military forces may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this code by virtue of a separation from any subsequent period of service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 3; 1970, ch. 56, § 3; 2013, ch. 32, § 8, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Pendency of charges before, or sentence by, as affecting power of court to discharge minor from military service. 137 A.L.R. 1486; 147 A.L.R. 1311; 151 A.L.R. 1455; 153 A.L.R. 1420; 155 A.L.R. 1451; 157 A.L.R. 1449.

35.022.
Judge advocates. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.025.
Dismissal of commissioned officers. [Repealed.]

35.030.
Territorial applicability of the code.

This code has applicability at all times and in all places subject to the personal jurisdiction as provided in KRS

35.015

, or, if not in a duty status, that there is a nexus between the act or omission constituting the offense and the efficient functioning of the state military forces; however, this grant of military jurisdiction shall neither preclude nor limit civilian jurisdiction over an offense, which is limited only by the prohibition of double jeopardy.

Courts-martial and courts of inquiry may be convened and held in units of the state military forces while those units are serving outside the same jurisdiction and powers as to persons subject to this code as if the proceeding were held inside the state, and offenses committed outside the state may be tried and punished either inside or outside the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 5, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 9, effective June 25, 2013.

35.031.
Judge advocates.

The senior force judge advocates in each of the state’s military forces or that judge advocate’s delegates shall make frequent inspections in the field of supervision of the administration of military justice.

Convening authorities shall at all times communicate directly with their judge advocates in matters relating to the administration of military justice. The judge advocate of any command is entitled to communicate directly with the judge advocate of a superior or subordinate command, or with the state judge advocate.

No person who has acted as member, military judge, trial counsel, defense counsel, or investigating officer, or who has been a witness in any case may later act as a judge advocate to any reviewing authority upon the same case.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 31, § 10, eff. June 25, 2013.

35.033.
Military judges.

Procedures pertaining to the selection and regulation of military judges shall be promulgated by the adjutant general and approved by the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 11, effective June 25, 2013.

35.035.
Apprehension.

Apprehension is the taking of a person into custody.

Any person authorized by this code or by 10 U.S.C. Chapter 47, or by regulations issued under either, to apprehend persons subject to this code, any marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to the provisions of this code, and any peace officer or civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state, may do so upon probable cause that an offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers, petty officers, and noncommissioned officers have authority to quell quarrels, frays, and disorders among persons subject to this code and to apprehend persons subject to this code who take part therein.

If an offender is apprehended outside the state, the offender’s return to the jurisdiction must be in accordance with normal extradition procedures or by reciprocal agreement.

No person authorized by this section to apprehend persons subject to this code or the place where the offender is confined, restrained, held, or otherwise housed may require payment of any fee or charge for receiving, apprehending, confining, restraining, holding, or otherwise housing a person except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 6, effective July 1, 1954; 1986, ch. 239, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 32, § 12, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

There is no conflict between RCr 2.04 and the provisions contained in subsection (2) of this section.

OAG 79-576

.

Under the military code, the equivalent of a magistrate would be the commanding officer authorized under KRS 35.045(2) to order the apprehension of an individual who has violated the provisions of the code.

OAG 79-576

.

35.040.
Apprehension of deserters. [Repealed.]

35.045.
Imposition of restraint.

Arrest is the restraint of a person by an order not imposed as a punishment for an offense, directing the person to remain within certain specified limits. Confinement is the physical restraint of a person.

An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commissioned officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person, or through other persons subject to this code. A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers, petty officers, or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of the commanding officer’s command or subject to the commanding officer’s authority into arrest or confinement.

A commissioned officer, a warrant officer, or a civilian subject to this code or to trial thereunder may be ordered into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer to whose authority he or she is subject, by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer. The authority to order such persons into arrest or confinement may not be delegated.

No person may be ordered into arrest or confinement except for probable cause.

This section does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until proper authority may be notified.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 8; 1970, ch. 56, § 7; 2013, ch. 32, § 13, effective June 25, 2013.

35.050.
Restraint of person charged with offenses.

Any subject person charged with an offense under this code may be ordered into arrest or confinement, as circumstances may require. When any person subject to this code is placed in arrest or confinement prior to trial, immediate steps shall be taken to inform the person of the specific wrong of which the person is accused and diligent steps shall be taken to try the person or to dismiss the charges and release the person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 9; 1970, ch. 56, § 8; 1986, ch. 239, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 32, § 14, effective June 25, 2013.

35.055.
Place of confinement — Reports and receiving of prisoners.

If a person subject to this code is confined before, during, or after trial, confinement shall be in a civilian or military confinement facility.

No person authorized to receive prisoners pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to the person’s charge by a commissioned officer of the state military forces, when the committing officer furnishes a statement, signed by the officer, of the offense charged against the prisoner, unless otherwise authorized by law.

Every person authorized to receive prisoners pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, to whose charge a prisoner is committed shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after that commitment or as soon as he or she is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the offense charged against the prisoner, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 10, effective July 1, 1954; 1986, ch. 239, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 32, § 15, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Jailer’s fees attributed to military prisoners of Kentucky should be paid out of the state treasury.

OAG 64-460

.

Prisoners who are members of the national guard, not on extended active federal duty, for the purpose of jailer’s fees, are state prisoners and the fees should be paid out of the state treasury.

OAG 64-460

.

35.057.
Confinement with enemy prisoners prohibited.

No member of the state military forces may be placed in confinement in immediate association with enemy prisoners or other foreign nationals not members of the Armed Forces.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 16, effective June 25, 2013.

35.060.
Punishment prohibited before trial.

No person, while being held for trial or awaiting a verdict, shall be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against the person, nor shall the arrest or confinement imposed upon the person be any more rigorous than the circumstances require to insure the person’s presence, but the person may be subjected to minor punishment during that period for infractions of discipline.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 11, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 17, effective June 25, 2013.

35.065.
Delivery of offenders to civil authorities.

A person subject to this code accused of an offense against civil authority may be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial or confinement.

When delivery under this chapter is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, the delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial, and the offender, after having answered to the civil authorities for the offense, shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to the place of original custody for the completion of the person’s sentence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 12; 1970, ch. 56, § 9; 2013, ch. 32, § 18, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Civil and criminal liability of militiamen. 135 A.L.R. 10; 147 A.L.R. 1429; 151 A.L.R. 1463; 153 A.L.R. 1432; 154 A.L.R. 1457; 158 A.L.R. 1462.

Official immunity of state national guard members, 52 A.L.R.4th 1095.

Courts martial jurisdiction over members of armed forces for “civilian” offenses, 14 A.L.R. Fed. 152.

35.070.
Commanding officer’s nonjudicial punishment.

Under such regulations as prescribed, any commanding officer, and for purposes of this section, officers-in-charge, may impose disciplinary punishments for minor offenses without the intervention of a court-martial pursuant to this section. The Governor, the adjutant general, or an officer of a general or flag rank in command may delegate the powers under this section to a principal assistant who is a member of the state military forces.

Any commanding officer may impose upon enlisted members of the officer’s command:

An admonition;

A reprimand;

The withholding of privileges for not more than six (6) months;

The forfeiture of pay of not more than seven (7) days’ pay;

A fine of not more than seven (7) days’ pay;

A reduction to the next inferior pay grade if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction;

Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties, for not more than fourteen (14) days, which need not be consecutive; and

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than fourteen (14) days, which need not be consecutive.

Any commanding officer of the grade of major or lieutenant commander or above may impose upon enlisted members of the officer’s command:

Any punishment authorized in subsection (2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section;

The forfeiture of not more than fourteen (14) days’ pay;

A fine of not more than fourteen (14) days’ pay;

A reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade, if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction, but an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-4 may not be reduced more than two (2) pay grades;

Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties, for not more than forty-five (45) days which need not be consecutive; and

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than sixty (60) days which need not be consecutive.

The Governor, the adjutant general, an officer exercising general court-martial convening authority, or an officer of a general or flag rank in command may impose:

Upon officers in the officer’s command:

Any punishment authorized in paragraph (a), (b), (c), or (f) of subsection (3) of this section; and

Arrest in quarters for not more than thirty (30) days which need not be consecutive;

Upon enlisted members of the officer’s command, any punishment authorized in subsection (3) of this section.

Whenever any of those punishments are combined to run consecutively, the total length of the combined punishment cannot exceed the authorized duration of the longest punishment in the combination, and there must be an apportionment of punishments so that no single punishment in the combination exceeds its authorized length under this section.

Prior to the offer of non-judicial punishment, the commanding officer shall determine whether arrest in quarters, restriction, forfeiture, or fine shall be considered as punishments. Should the commanding officer determine that the punishment options may include arrest in quarters, restriction, forfeiture, or fine, the accused shall be notified of the right to demand a trial by court-martial. Should the commanding officer determine that the punishment options will not include arrest in quarters, restriction, forfeiture, or fine, the accused shall be notified that there is no right to trial by courts-martial in lieu of non-judicial punishment.

The officer who imposes punishment, or the successor in command, may, at any time, suspend, set aside, mitigate, or remit any part or amount of the punishment and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected. The officer also may mitigate:

Reduction in grade to forfeiture of pay;

Arrest in quarters to restriction; or

Extra duties to restriction.

The mitigated punishment shall not be for a greater period than the punishment mitigated. When mitigating reduction in grade to forfeiture of pay, the amount of the forfeiture shall not be greater than the amount that could have been imposed initially under this section by the officer who imposed the punishment mitigated.

A person punished under this section who considers the punishment unjust or disproportionate to the offense may, through the proper channel, appeal to the next superior authority within fifteen (15) days after the punishment is either announced or sent to the accused, as the commander may determine. The appeal shall be promptly forwarded and decided, but the person punished may in the meantime be required to undergo the punishment adjudged. The superior authority may exercise the same powers with respect to the punishment imposed as may be exercised under subsection (7) of this section by the officer who imposed the punishment. Before acting on an appeal from a punishment, the authority that is to act on the appeal may refer the case to a judge advocate for consideration and advice.

The imposition and enforcement of disciplinary punishment under this section for any act or omission is not a bar to trial by court-martial or a civilian court of competent jurisdiction for a serious crime or offense growing out of the same act or omission, and not properly punishable under this section; but the fact that a disciplinary punishment has been enforced may be shown by the accused upon trial, and when so shown shall be considered in determining the amount of punishment to be adjudged in the event of a finding of guilty.

Whenever a punishment of forfeiture of pay is imposed as provided in this section, the forfeiture may apply to pay accruing before, on, or after the date that punishment is imposed.

Regulations may prescribe the form of forfeiture of records to be kept of proceedings under this section and may prescribe that certain categories of those proceedings shall be in writing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 13; 1970, ch. 56, § 10; 1974, ch. 108, § 1; 1986, ch. 239, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 32, § 19, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 75, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

35.075.
Courts-martial classified.

The two (2) kinds of courts-martial in the state military forces are:

General courts-martial, consisting of:

A military judge and not less than five (5) members; or

Only a military judge, if before the court is assembled the accused, knowing the identity of the military judge and after consultation with defense counsel, requests orally on the record or in writing a court composed only of a military judge and the military judge approves; and

Special courts-martial, consisting of:

A military judge and not less than three (3) members; or

Only a military judge, if one has been detailed to the court, and the accused under the same conditions as those prescribed in subsection (1)(b) of this section so requests.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 14; 1970, ch. 56, § 11; 2013, ch. 32, § 20, effective June 25, 2013.

35.080.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial in general.

Each component of the state military forces has court-martial jurisdiction over all members of the particular component who are subject to this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 15, effective July 1, 1954; 1986, ch. 239, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 32, § 21, effective June 25, 2013.

35.085.
Jurisdiction of general courts-martial.

Subject to KRS

35.080

, general courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code, and may, under those limitations as the Governor may prescribe, adjudge any punishment not forbidden by this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 16; 1970, ch. 56, § 12; 1974, ch. 108, § 2; 1986, ch. 239, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 32, § 22, effective June 25, 2013.

35.090.
Jurisdiction of special courts-martial.

Subject to KRS

35.080

, special courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code, and may, under those limitations as the Governor may prescribe, adjudge any punishment not forbidden by this code except dishonorable discharge, dismissal, confinement for more than one (1) year, forfeiture of pay exceeding two-thirds (2/3) pay per month, or forfeiture of pay for more than one (1) year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 17; 1970, ch. 56, § 13; 1974, ch. 108, § 3; 1986, ch. 239, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 32, § 23, effective June 25, 2013.

35.095.
Jurisdiction of summary courts-martial. [Repealed.]

35.100.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial not exclusive. [Repealed.]

35.105.
Who may convene general courts-martial.

General courts-martial may be convened by:

The Governor;

The adjutant general; or

A general officer who is designated as a commander.

If any such commanding officer is an accuser, the court shall be convened by superior competent authority and may in any case be convened by such superior competent authority if considered desirable by that authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 20, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 24, effective June 25, 2013.

35.110.
Who may convene special courts-martial.

Special courts-martial may be convened by:

Any person who may convene a general court-martial;

The commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, station, Air National Guard base, or naval base or station;

The commanding officer of a brigade, regiment, detached battalion, or corresponding unit of the Army;

The commanding officer of a wing, group, separate squadron, or corresponding unit of the Air Force; or

The commanding officer or officer in charge of any other command, when empowered by the adjutant general.

If any such officer is an accuser, the court shall be convened by superior competent authority, and may in any case be convened by that superior authority if considered desirable by that authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 21, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 25, effective June 25, 2013.

35.115.
Who may convene a summary court-martial. [Repealed.]

35.120.
Who may serve on courts-martial.

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces is eligible to serve on all courts-martial for the trial of any person subject to this code.

Any warrant officer of the state military forces is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any person subject to this code, other than a commissioned officer.

Any enlisted member of the state military forces who is not a member of the same unit as the accused is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any enlisted member subject to this code, but that member shall serve as a member of a court only if, before the conclusion of a session called by the military judge under KRS

35.195

prior to trial or, in the absence of such a session, before the court is assembled for the trial of the accused, the accused personally has requested orally on the record or in writing that enlisted members serve on it. After such request the accused shall not be tried by a general or special court-martial the membership of which does not include enlisted persons in a number comprising at least one-third (1/3) of the total membership of the court, unless eligible enlisted members cannot be obtained on account of physical conditions or military exigencies. If enlisted members cannot be obtained, the court may be assembled and the trial held without them, but the convening authority shall make a detailed written statement, to be appended to the record, stating why they could not be obtained. For the purposes of this section, the word “unit” means any regularly organized body of the state military forces not larger than a company, a squadron, a division of the naval militia, or a body corresponding to one (1) of them.

When it can be avoided, no person subject to this code may be tried by a court-martial any member of which is junior to the accused in rank or grade.

When convening a court-martial, the convening authority shall detail as members thereof such members of the state military forces as, in the convening authority’s opinion, are best qualified for the duty by reason of age, education, training, experience, length of service, and judicial temperament. No member of the state military forces is eligible to serve as a member of a general or special court-martial when that member is the accuser, a witness, or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 23; 1970, ch. 56, § 15; 1974, ch. 108, § 5; 2013, ch. 32, § 26, effective June 25, 2013.

35.125.
Military judge of a general or special court-martial.

A military judge shall be detailed to each general and special court-martial. The military judge shall preside over each open session of the court-martial to which the military judge has been detailed.

A military judge shall be all of the following:

An active or retired commissioned officer of the Judge Advocate General’s Corps;

A member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state or a member of the bar of a federal court for at least five (5) years; and

A judge certified by the service component Judge Advocate General’s Corps, the senior force judge advocate of the state, or a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction who is approved by the adjutant general, subject to the order of succession in subsection (5) of this section. For purposes of this section, “certified” means the judge advocate certification and assignment as a military judge upon completion of the Judge Advocate General’s Legal Center and School’s military judge training, as referenced in Army Regulation 27-10 or Structure Manning Decision Review 27-10, paragraphs 1 through 4(b).

In the instance when a military judge is not a member of the bar of the highest court of the state, the military judge shall be deemed admitted pro hac vice, subject to filing a certificate with the senior force judge advocate which is the same force as the accused setting forth the qualifications provided in subsection (2) of this section, and with notice and approval of the state bar and the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court.

The military judge of a general or special court-martial shall be designated by the senior force judge advocate which is the same force as the accused, or a designee, for detail by the convening authority. Neither the convening authority nor any staff member of the convening authority shall prepare or review any report concerning the effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency of the military judge so detailed, which relates to performance of duty as a military judge.

The senior force judge advocate shall designate the military judge who is currently assigned to the state military forces and certified as a military judge by his or her service component of the Judge Advocate General’s Corps. If that military judge is unavailable, then the senior force judge advocate shall designate upon consideration of this order of succession:

A current member of the state military forces who has been certified as a military judge by his or her service component of the Judge Advocate General’s Corps;

A current member of the state military forces who is both a judge advocate and an actively serving judge of a court of competent jurisdiction;

A retired judge advocate of the state military forces who is an actively serving judge of a court of competent jurisdiction;

Any other military judge certified by his or her service component of the Judge Advocate General’s Corps; or

Any other military judge certified by the senior force judge advocate as set out in Structure Manning Decision Review 27-10.

No person is eligible to act as military judge in a case if that person is the accuser, a witness, or has acted as investigating officer or a counsel in the same case.

The military judge of a court-martial may not consult with the members of the court except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel, nor vote with the members of the court.

The designation of a military judge shall not be by political appointment. The designation of a military judge by the senior force judge advocate under subsection (5) of this section shall ensure uniformity and impartiality, and prevent any appearance of impropriety. The senior force judge advocate shall assign a military judge from a predetermined list of military judges.

A military judge does not have to be in the same service as the accused. However, the court-martial shall be conducted using the implementing regulations and procedures of the military service of the accused to the extent that they apply and are not inconsistent with this code. When a service member is tried by a court-martial convened by a joint commander, the applicable implementing regulations and procedures of the service of which the accused is a member shall be used to the extent they apply and are not inconsistent with this code, the state manual for courts-martial, and their implementing regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 24; 1970, ch. 56, § 16; 2013, ch. 32, § 27, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 75, § 3, effective July 15, 2016.

35.130.
Detail of trial counsel and defense counsel.

For each general and special court-martial the authority convening the court shall detail trial counsel, defense counsel, and assistants as are appropriate.

No person who has acted as investigating officer, military judge, or court member in any case may act later as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, or, unless expressly requested by the accused, as defense counsel or assistant or associate defense counsel in the same case. No person who has acted for the prosecution may act later in the same case for the defense, nor may any person who has acted for the defense act later in the same case for the prosecution.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, trial counsel and defense counsel detailed for a general and special court-martial must be a judge advocate.

In the instance when a defense counsel is not a member of the bar of the highest court of the state, the defense counsel shall be deemed admitted pro hac vice, subject to filing a certificate with the military judge setting forth qualifications that counsel is:

A commissioned officer of the Armed Forces of the United States or a component thereof; and

A member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state; and

Either:

Certified as a judge advocate in the Judge Advocate General’s Corps of the Army, Air Force, Navy, or the Marine Corps; or

A judge advocate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 25; 1970, ch. 56, § 17; 2013, ch. 32, § 28, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2013). The numbering and lettering of subsection (2) of this statute have been changed. Paragraphs (c) and (d) in the enacted version (2013 Ky. Acts ch. 32, sec. 28) have been renumbered as subparagraphs 1. and 2. of paragraph (c), and the word “Either:” has been inserted at the beginning of paragraph (c). The Reviser of Statutes has made this change under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

35.135.
Persons ineligible as staff judge advocate or legal officer to reviewing authority upon same case. [Repealed.]

35.140.
Detail or employment of reporters and interpreters.

Under such regulations as may be prescribed, the convening authority of a general or special court-martial or court of inquiry shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court and may detail or employ interpreters who shall interpret for the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 27; 1974, ch. 108, § 6; 2013, ch. 32, § 29, effective June 25, 2013.